Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.070

Tort liability or immunity—Good faith.

(1) For purposes of tort liability or immunity, an emergency responder of a responding member jurisdiction is considered an agent of the requesting member jurisdiction.

(2) A responding member jurisdiction rendering aid under this system is not liable for the acts or omissions in good faith of the responding member jurisdiction's emergency responders or resources.

(3) For purposes of this section, good faith does not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

[ 2011 c 215 s 7.]